Utah statutes.
36-1-102.   Election of senators -- Staggered terms.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by law, each senator elected from Senate Districts 1, 6, 8, 10, 13, 14, 16, 19, 20, 23, 24, 25, 27, and 29 at the 2000 General Election shall serve out the term of office for which he or she was elected and shall represent the realigned district if he or she resides in that district.

(2)  At the general election to be held in 2002, senators elected from Senate Districts 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 9, 11, 12, 15, 17, 18, 21, 22, 26, and 28 shall be elected to serve a term of office of four years.

